New York, session 2025-2026, A10343.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 831 of the laws of 1981, amending the 2 labor law relating to fees and expenses in unemployment insurance 3 proceedings, as amended by chapter 250 of the laws of 2024, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 § 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 1982, provided, however, 6 that paragraphs (a) and (c) of subdivision 3 of section 538 of the labor 7 law as added by section one of this act shall remain in full force and 8 effect until December 31, [2026] 2028. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15016-01-6